District of Columbia statutes.
48-905.04

Educational programs; research purposes.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and operate an educational program consisting of films, lectures, panel discussions, or whatever other educational device the Mayor deems necessary and appropriate to enlighten persons on the habitual use of controlled substances in general and to instill in persons participating in such a program a respect for the law and legal institutions.

(b)

The Mayor shall cooperate with the Board of Education in preparing similar programs for school children with the purpose of preventing their abuse of controlled substances.

(c)

The Mayor shall prepare and operate similar and appropriate programs for children found to be delinquent for violation of the provisions of this chapter.

(d)

The Mayor may authorize the possession and distribution of controlled substances by persons engaged in research. Possession and distribution of controlled substances by such persons, in the course of their research and to the extent of the authorization, does not violate the provisions of this chapter.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 504, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-554.
This section is referenced in § 16-2320.